Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4895.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 314. (1) A board shall recommend to the department the approval or recognition of a program of continuing education which that is required by an article, unless it is the board's function to grant the approval or recognition. (2) The department shall allow 100% of the continuing education requirements for an occupation under this act to be completed through an online or electronic media. An online or electronic continuing education program must meet the standards set by the department by rule in consultation with the applicable board.